North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-17.1 Emergency Services
37-17.1-11.
Disaster or emergency mitigation.

In addition to disaster or emergency mitigation measures as included in the state and local disaster or emergency operational plans, the governor shall consider, on a continuing basis, steps that could be taken to mitigate or reduce the harmful consequences of disasters or emergencies. At the governor’s direction, and pursuant to any other authority and capability they have, state agencies charged with responsibilities in connection with floodplain management, stream encroachment and flow regulation, weather modification, fire prevention and control, air quality, public works, land use and land use planning, and construction standards, shall make studies of disaster or emergency mitigation-related matters. The governor, from time to time, shall make recommendations to the legislative assembly, local governments, and other appropriate public and private entities as may facilitate measures for mitigation or reduction of the harmful consequences of disasters or emergencies.

The water commission and department of water resources, in conjunction with the division of homeland security, shall keep land uses and construction of structures and other facilities under continuing study and identify areas that are particularly susceptible to severe land shifting, subsidence, flood, or other catastrophic occurrence. The studies under this subsection must concentrate on means of reducing or avoiding the dangers caused by severe land shifting, subsidence, flood, or other catastrophic occurrence, or the consequences of severe land shifting, subsidence, flood, or other catastrophic occurrence.

If the division of homeland security determines, in coordination with lead and support agencies, on the basis of the studies or other competent evidence, that an area is susceptible to a disaster of catastrophic proportions without adequate warning; existing building standards and land use controls in that area are inadequate and could add substantially to the magnitude of the disaster or emergency; and changes in zoning regulations, other land use regulations, or building requirements are needed in order to further the purposes of this section, it shall specify the essential changes to the governor. If the governor, upon review of the determination, finds after public hearing, that the changes are essential, the governor shall so recommend to the agencies or local governments with jurisdiction over that area and subject matter. If no action or insufficient action pursuant to the governor’s recommendations is taken within the time specified by the governor, the governor shall so inform the legislative assembly and request legislative action appropriate to mitigate the impact of the disaster or emergency.

The governor, at the same time that the governor makes recommendations pursuant to subsection 3, may suspend the standard or control which the governor finds to be inadequate to protect the public safety and by regulation place a new standard or control in effect. The new standard or control remains in effect until rejected by concurrent resolution of both houses of the legislative assembly or amended by the governor. During the time it is in effect, the standard or control contained in the governor’s regulation must be administered and given full effect by all relevant regulatory agencies of the state and local governments to which it applies. The governor’s action is subject to judicial review in accordance with chapter 28-32 but is not subject to temporary stay pending litigation.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 11; 1985, ch. 398, § 10; 2005, ch. 16, § 18; 2007, ch. 308, § 7; 2021, ch. 488, § 14, effective August 1, 2021.

37-17.1-12.
Compensation — Entitlement — Time — Amount.

Persons within this state shall conduct themselves and keep and manage their affairs and property in ways that will reasonably assist and will not unreasonably detract from the ability of the state and the public to effectively prevent, mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from a disaster or emergency. This obligation includes appropriate personal service and use or restriction on the use of property in time of disaster or emergency. This chapter neither increases nor decreases these obligations but recognizes their existence under the Constitution of North Dakota and statutes of this state and the common law. Compensation for services or for the taking or use of property must be only to the extent that obligations recognized herein are exceeded in a particular case and then only to the extent that the claimant may not be deemed to have volunteered that person’s services or property without compensation.

Personal services may not be compensated by the state or any county or city thereof, except pursuant to statute or local law or ordinance.

Compensation for property may be paid if the property was commandeered or otherwise used in management of a disaster or emergency declared under proper authority to the extent not otherwise waived or agreed upon before the use of property.

A claim made against a county or city must be made in writing to the appropriate governing body within two years after the use, damage, loss, or destruction of the property under proper authority is discovered or reasonably should have been discovered, may only be for actual damages not recovered from claimants’ property or other applicable insurance, and may be paid from any combination of funds provided under section 40-22-01.1, disaster relief funds made available to a county or city for this purpose, or other funds at the discretion of the governing body. A city or county may establish reasonable provisions for the payment of compensation.

Any person claiming compensation for the use, damage, loss, or destruction of property by the state under this chapter shall file a written claim therefor with the office of management and budget in the form and manner required by the office. The claim for compensation must be received by the office of management and budget within two years after the use, damage, loss, or destruction of the property pursuant to the governor’s order under section 37-17.1-05 is discovered or reasonably should have been discovered or compensation under this chapter is waived.

Unless the amount of compensation on account of property damaged, lost, or destroyed is agreed between the claimant and the office of management and budget, the amount of compensation must be calculated in the same manner as compensation due for a taking of property pursuant to the condemnation laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 12; 1985, ch. 398, § 11; 1999, ch. 325, § 1; 2007, ch. 308, § 8; 2013, ch. 270, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 270, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-13.
Communications.

The department of emergency services shall ascertain what means exist for rapid and efficient communications in times of a disaster or emergency. The department shall consider the desirability of supplementing these communications resources or of integrating them into a comprehensive state or state and federal telecommunications or other communications system or network, including the military installations. In studying the character and feasibility of any system or its several parts, the department shall evaluate the possibility of multipurpose use thereof for general state and local governmental purposes. The department shall make recommendations to the governor as appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 13; 1985, ch. 398, § 12; 2005, ch. 16, § 19; 2007, ch. 308, § 9.

37-17.1-14.
Mutual aid.

Counties and cities must be encouraged and assisted by the division of homeland security to conclude suitable arrangements for furnishing mutual aid in emergency management. The arrangements must include provision of aid by persons and units in public employ.

In review of local disaster or emergency plans, the division of homeland security shall consider whether they contain adequate provisions for the rendering and receipt of mutual aid.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 14; 1985, ch. 398, § 13; 2005, ch. 16, § 20.

37-17.1-14.1.
Mutual aid — Cooperation.

The division of homeland security shall encourage and assist political subdivisions to enter mutual aid agreements with other public and private agencies within the state for reciprocal aid and assistance in responding to and recovering from actual and potential disasters or emergencies.

In reviewing emergency operations plans and programs of political subdivisions, the division of homeland security shall consider whether the plans and programs contain adequate provisions for mutual aid.

Local emergency management organizations may assist in negotiation of mutual aid agreements between the governor and an adjoining state or province or a political subdivision of a province and shall carry out arrangements of any such agreements relating to the local political subdivision.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 381, § 1; 2005, ch. 16, § 21; 2013, ch. 271, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 271, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 271, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-14.2.
Interstate mutual aid agreements.

This state may enter an interstate mutual aid agreement or compact with any state that has enacted or shall enact the compact substantially in the form contained in section 37-17.1-14.5.

This state may enter the northern emergency management assistance compact with any state or Canadian province that has enacted or shall enact the compact substantially in the form contained in section 37-17.1-14.6.

This state may enter an interstate agreement with any state if the governor finds that joint action with that state is desirable in meeting common intergovernmental problems of emergency or disaster prevention, protection, mitigation, response, and recovery.

This state may enter intergovernmental arrangements with neighboring Canadian provinces for the purpose of exchanging emergency or disaster resources. When considered of mutual benefit, the governor may, subject to the limitations of law enter such agreements.

If a person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state or political subdivision evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, the person may render aid involving that skill in this state to meet an emergency or disaster, and this state shall give due recognition to the license, certificate, or other permit.

All interstate mutual aid compacts and other interstate agreements, to which this state is a party, dealing with emergency or disaster prevention, protection, mitigation, response, and recovery must be reviewed and made current every four years.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 381, § 2; 1997, ch. 315, § 2; 2007, ch. 308, § 10; 2019, ch. 291, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

37-17.1-14.3.
Authority to join interstate mutual aid agreements — Interstate compacts.

The governor, in the name of the state, may join with other states and Canadian provinces in the interstate mutual aid agreement or compact.

The governor may negotiate and execute such supplemental agreements as may be necessary and proper to fully carry out the terms and provisions of the mutual aid agreements or compacts as set forth in sections 37-17.1-14.5 and 37-17.1-14.6.

The governor may deny the request of a requesting state or Canadian province as the governor determines necessary.

Local emergency management organizations may enter interstate mutual aid agreements with nearby political subdivisions or public response entities. Such agreements are valid once filed with the department of emergency services.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 381, § 3; 1997, ch. 315, § 3; 2013, ch. 271, § 2; 2019, ch. 291, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 271, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-14.4.
Text of the mutual aid agreement or compact. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 315, § 5.

37-17.1-14.5.
Text of the mutual aid agreement or compact.

The interstate mutual aid agreement or compact referred to in sections 37-17.1-14.2 and 37-17.1-14.3 reads as follows:

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 315, § 4.

INTERSTATE MUTUAL AID AGREEMENT OR COMPACT

ARTICLE I
PURPOSE AND AUTHORITIES

This compact is made and entered into by and between the participating member states which enact this compact, hereinafter called party states. For the purposes of this agreement, the term “states” is taken to mean the several states, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, and all United States territorial possessions.

The purpose of this compact is to provide for mutual assistance between the states entering into this compact in managing any emergency or disaster that is duly declared by the governor of the affected state, whether arising from natural disaster, technological hazard, manmade disaster, civil emergency aspects of resources shortages, community disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

This compact shall also provide for mutual cooperation in emergency-related exercises, testing, or other training activities using equipment and personnel simulating performance of any aspect of the giving and receiving of aid by party states or subdivisions of party states during emergencies, such actions occurring outside actual declared emergency periods. Mutual assistance in this compact may include the use of the states’ national guard forces, either in accordance with the national guard mutual assistance compact or by mutual agreement between states.

ARTICLE II
GENERAL IMPLEMENTATION

Each party state entering into this compact recognizes many emergencies transcend political jurisdictional boundaries and that intergovernmental coordination is essential in managing these and other emergencies under this compact. Each state further recognizes that there will be emergencies which require immediate access and present procedures to apply outside resources to make a prompt and effective response to such an emergency. This is because few, if any, individual states have all the resources they may need in all types of emergencies or the capability of delivering resources to areas where emergencies exist.

The prompt, full, and effective utilization of resources of the participating states, including any resources on hand or available from the federal government or any other source, that are essential to the safety, care, and welfare of the people in the event of any emergency or disaster declared by a party state, shall be the underlying principle on which all articles of this compact shall be understood.

On behalf of the governor of each state participating in the compact, the legally designated state official who is assigned responsibility for emergency management will be responsible for formulation of the appropriate interstate mutual aid plans and procedures necessary to implement this compact.

ARTICLE III
PARTY STATE RESPONSIBILITIES

It shall be the responsibility of each party state to formulate procedural plans and programs for interstate cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this article. In formulating such plans, and in carrying them out, the party states, insofar as practical, shall:

Review individual state hazards analyses and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party states might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, manmade disaster, emergency aspects of resource shortages, civil disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

Review party states’ individual emergency plans and develop a plan which will determine the mechanism for the interstate management and provision of assistance concerning any potential emergency.

Develop interstate procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans.

Assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing the state boundaries.

Protect and assure uninterrupted delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue, and critical lifeline equipment, services, and resources, both human and material.

Inventory and set procedures for the interstate loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness.

Provide, to the extent authorized by law, for temporary suspension of any statutes or ordinances that restrict the implementation of the above responsibilities.

The authorized representative of a party state may request assistance of another party state by contacting the authorized representative of that state. The provisions of this agreement shall only apply to requests for assistance made by and to authorized representatives. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request shall be confirmed in writing within thirty days of the verbal request. Requests shall provide the following information:

A description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed, such as, but not limited to, fire services, law enforcement, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services, and search and rescue.

The amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed, and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed.

The specific place and time for staging of the assisting party’s response and a point of contact at that location.

There shall be frequent consultation between state officials who have assigned emergency management responsibilities and other appropriate representatives of the party states with affected jurisdictions and the United States government, with free exchange of information, plans, and resource records relating to emergency capabilities.

ARTICLE IV
LIMITATIONS

Any party state requested to render mutual aid or conduct exercises and training for mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state.

Each party state shall afford to the emergency forces of any party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights, and privileges as are afforded forces of the state in which they are performing emergency services. Emergency forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the emergency services authorities of the state receiving assistance. These conditions may be activated, as needed, only subsequent to a declaration of a state of emergency or disaster by the governor of the party state that is to receive assistance or commencement of exercises or training for mutual aid and shall continue so long as the exercises or training for mutual aid are in progress, the state of emergency or disaster remains in effect, or loaned resources remain in the receiving state, whichever is longer.

ARTICLE V
LICENSES AND PERMITS

Whenever any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state party to the compact evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, and when such assistance is requested by the receiving party state, such person shall be deemed licensed, certified, or permitted by the state requesting assistance to render aid involving such skill to meet a declared emergency or disaster, subject to such limitations and conditions as the governor of the requesting state may prescribe by executive order or otherwise.

ARTICLE VI
LIABILITY

Officers or employees of a party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be considered agents of the requesting state for tort liability and immunity purposes; and no party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith. Good faith in this article shall not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

ARTICLE VII
SUPPLEMENTARY AGREEMENTS

Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two or more states may differ from that among the states that are party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or affect any other agreements already in force between states. Supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, and equipment and supplies.

ARTICLE VIII
COMPENSATION

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency forces of that state and representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within their own state.

ARTICLE IX
REIMBURSEMENT

Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to or expenses incurred in the operation of any equipment and the provision of any service in answering a request for aid and for the costs incurred in connection with such requests; provided that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense, or other cost, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and provided further that any two or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs among those states. Article VIII expenses shall not be reimbursable under this provision.

ARTICLE X
EVACUATION

Plans for the orderly evacuation and interstate reception of portions of the civilian population as the result of any emergency or disaster of sufficient proportions to so warrant, shall be worked out and maintained between the party states and the emergency management/services directors of the various jurisdictions where any type of incident requiring evacuations might occur. Such plans shall be put into effect by request of the state from which evacuees come and shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing, and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends, and the forwarding of such evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. Such plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees and the party state from which the evacuees come shall mutually agree as to reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care, and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed as agreed by the party state from which the evacuees come. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state from which the evacuees come shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support of repatriation of such evacuees.

ARTICLE XI
IMPLEMENTATION

1.

This compact shall become operative immediately upon its enactment into law by any two states; thereafter, this compact shall become effective as to any other state upon its enactment by such state.

2.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until thirty days after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of such withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. Such action shall not relieve the withdrawing state from obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

3.

Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and with the federal emergency management agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States government.

ARTICLE XII
VALIDITY

This Act shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in article I hereof. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this Act and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

ARTICLE XIII
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS

Nothing in this compact shall authorize or permit the use of military force by the national guard of a state at any place outside that state in any emergency for which the president is authorized by law to call into federal service the militia, or for any purpose for which the use of the army or the air force would in the absence of express statutory authorization be prohibited under section 1385 of title 18, United States Code.

37-17.1-14.6
Northern emergency management assistance compact.

The northern emergency management assistance compact is entered with all jurisdictions legally joining the compact in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I - NAME AND SCOPE

This compact is established as directed by the state and province emergency management assistance memorandum of agreement and brought into force by congressional consent on September 14, 2012, by the 112th Congress of the United States of America.

The object of this compact shall be to facilitate cross-border emergency management assistance through mutual aid.

A co-chair elected from the participating states; and

A co-chair elected from the participating provinces.

The co-chairs shall be elected biennially in alternate years.

In the event a co-chair is unable to fulfill the co-chair’s term, a special election shall be held at the next meeting, regular or special, to fill the remainder of the co-chair’s term.

The newest co-chair shall be responsible for creating a record of decisions for each meeting.

The newest co-chair shall be responsible for distributing meeting agendas, records of decisions, and any documents slated for discussion at a meeting to the board of directors.

A meeting agenda and any documents slated for discussion at a meeting should be circulated to the board of directors a minimum of thirty days prior to the meeting.

All meetings shall follow a form agreed to by the co-chairs.

A quorum shall consist of a simple majority of party jurisdictions that consists of at least one party jurisdiction from Canada and one party jurisdiction from the United States of America. Jurisdictions participating by proxy shall not count towards a quorum.

ARTICLE II - MEMBERSHIP

1.

Membership in this compact shall be open to the states and provinces having signed the state and province emergency management assistance memorandum of agreement, hereinafter referred to as party jurisdictions.

2.

Representatives from the nonsignatory states and provinces as well as the national governments of Canada and the United States shall be nonvoting members.

ARTICLE III - BOARD

1.

The policies and direction of this compact shall be directed and controlled by a board of directors, which shall consist of the directors of emergency management or measures, or their designated official substitute from the party jurisdictions. The designated official substitute shall be specified either on the jurisdiction’s compact contact sheet or in writing to the compact co-chairs.

2.

The board may invite representatives from other governments, subject matter experts, and such other individuals as they may deem appropriate to attend the compact meetings as nonvoting participants.

ARTICLE IV - GOVERNMENT

1.

The board of directors shall act as the governing body of this compact.

2.

The following shall be the officers:

ARTICLE V - SUBCOMMITTEES AND WORKING GROUPS

1.

The compact board of directors may appoint subcommittees and working groups as needed.

2.

Each subcommittee and working group shall be co-chaired by a representative of a Canadian and a United States party jurisdiction.

3.

The subcommittees and working groups shall report to this compact through the co-chairs and the co-chairs are ex officio members of all subcommittees and working groups.

ARTICLE VI - MEETINGS

1.

This compact shall meet at least once a year at locations to be determined by the board of directors.

2.

Special meetings may be held at any time by order of the co-chairs.

3.

Meetings may be held by conference call or other communication facilities that permit all persons participating in the meeting to communicate with each other, and all persons participating in the meeting by such means are deemed to be present.

4.

A jurisdiction may participate at its own cost in any meeting by telephone or other communication facilities that permit all persons participating in the meeting to communicate with each other, and a person participating in a meeting by such means is deemed to be present at the meeting.

ARTICLE VII - VOTING

1.

Each party jurisdiction shall have only one vote on any motion or election.

2.

Motions may only be introduced or seconded by members of the board of directors present or represented by proxy.

3.

Motions arising at any meeting shall be determined by consensus. In the absence of consensus a two-thirds majority is required from each of the Canadian and United States of America party jurisdictions either present or represented by proxy. A vote given in accordance with the terms of a proxy shall be valid.

4.

If the director or designated official substitute of a party jurisdiction cannot attend a meeting of the northern emergency management assistance compact, the party jurisdiction may give a proxy to another jurisdiction. A proxy shall be in writing under the hand of the director or designated official substitute. The proxy shall be delivered to one of the co-chairs before or at the meeting. A proxy is valid for one meeting.

ARTICLE VIII - SIGNING AUTHORITY

Documents or other instruments requiring the signature of the compact shall be signed by both co-chairs.

ARTICLE IX - AMENDMENTS

These bylaws may be amended by a two-thirds vote at any meeting of the compact provided that thirty days’ notice in writing be given of such meeting to the voting member of each party jurisdiction and that the notice contains the text, or the general nature, of any proposed amendments.

ARTICLE X - OPERATIONS MANUAL AND BYLAWS

1.

The most recent past co-chair shall be responsible for updating and storing a copy of the most recent version of the operations manual and bylaws.

2.

Any party jurisdiction may request that amendments be made to the operations manual and bylaws.

3.

All requests for amendments to the operations manual and bylaws shall be submitted to the past co-chair responsible for the operations manual and bylaws.

4.

Amendments to the operations manual and bylaws shall come into force on the date that the operations manual or bylaws, respectively, are approved by the board of directors or a later date as decided by the board of directors.

ARTICLE XI - TRAINING

The senior co-chair shall be responsible for coordinating delivery of the compact training and exercises to party jurisdictions.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 291, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 16, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.

37-17.1-15.
Weather modification.

The division of homeland security shall keep continuously apprised of weather conditions which present danger of precipitation or other climatic activity severe enough to constitute a disaster. If the division determines that precipitation resulting from weather modification operations, either by itself or in conjunction with other precipitation or climatic conditions or activity, would create or contribute to the severity of a disaster, the division shall direct the officer or agency empowered to issue permits for weather modification operations to suspend the issuance of the permits. No permits may be issued until the division informs the officer or agency that the danger has passed.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 15; 1985, ch. 398, § 14; 2005, ch. 16, § 22.

Cross-References.

Weather modification, see N.D.C.C. ch. 61-04.1.

37-17.1-16.
Immunity and exemption.

All functions hereunder and all other activities relating to emergency management are hereby declared to be governmental functions. The state, a county or city, any disaster or emergency worker, an employee of a federal agency on loan or leave to the state in support of emergency service response whether the emergency is declared or undeclared, or any other person providing goods or services during an emergency if the person is working in coordination with and under the direction of an appropriate governmental emergency or disaster response entity, complying with or reasonably attempting to comply with this chapter, or any executive order or disaster or emergency operational plan pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to any ordinance relating to any precautionary measures enacted by any county or city of the state, except in case of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, is not liable for the death of or injury to persons, or for damage to property except as compensation may be provided in section 37-17.1-12, as a result of any such activity. This section does not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which that person would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, or under workforce safety and insurance law, or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any Act of Congress.

Any requirement for a license to practice any professional, mechanical, or other skill does not apply to any authorized disaster or emergency worker who, in the course of performing the worker’s duties, practices the professional, mechanical, or other skill during a disaster or emergency.

This section does not affect any other provision of law that may provide immunity to a person that is providing volunteer assistance.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 16; 1985, ch. 398, § 15; 1989, ch. 69, § 39; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 307, § 1; 2011, ch. 259, § 1; 2013, ch. 270, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 270, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-17.
No private liability.

Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real estate or premises for the purpose of emergency management activities during an actual, impending, mock or practice disaster or emergency, is, together with their successors in interest, if any, not civilly liable, except in the case of gross negligence or willful and malicious failure to guard or warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity, for causing the death of, or injury to, any person on or about such real estate or premises or for loss of, or damage to, the property of such person.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 17; 1985, ch. 398, § 16; 2013, ch. 270, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 270, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-18.
Appropriations and authority to accept services, gifts, grants, and loans.

Each county or city has the power to make appropriations in the manner provided by law for making appropriations for the ordinary expenses of such county or city for the payment of expenses of its local emergency management organization.

Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof or any person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company offers to the state, or through the state to any county or city thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the governor or the emergency management director, or such county or city, acting through its executive officer or governing body, may accept such offer and may authorize any officer of the state, county, or city, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such county or city, and subject to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 18; 1985, ch. 398, § 17; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

37-17.1-18.1.
Crisis relocation plans — Public expenditures prohibited.

The expenditure of or authorization for an expenditure by any official or employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state of any funds, whether derived from the state, federal government, or any other source, for the purpose of planning, developing, or implementing any type of crisis relocation program or plan, the primary purpose of which is to effect a mass evacuation of this state’s civilian population in the event of the threat of nuclear war, is prohibited. This section does not prohibit the use of state, federal, or other funds for other disaster planning needs and activities as authorized by law.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 399, § 1.